Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 4. LIABILITY IN TORT

CHAPTER 100. USE OF FORCE IN DEFENSE OF COMMERCIAL NUCLEAR POWER PLANTS

Text of section effective until January 01, 2025

Sec. 100.001. AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE. It is an affirmative defense to a civil action for damages for personal injury or death brought against a person performing duties under Article 2.122(f), Code of Criminal Procedure, the person's employer, or the owner of a commercial nuclear power plant where the person was working, that at the time the cause of action arose the person was justified in using force under Chapter 9, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1237, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.011, eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on January 01, 2025

Sec. 100.001. AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE. It is an affirmative defense to a civil action for damages for personal injury or death brought against a person performing duties under Article 2A.002(f), Code of Criminal Procedure, the person's employer, or the owner of a commercial nuclear power plant where the person was working, that at the time the cause of action arose the person was justified in using force under Chapter 9, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1237, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.011, eff. January 1, 2025.